src/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 38 back
!!€  aakkosellinen: aakkosellinen+A+Sg+Nom # alphabetic

0:nen  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:se  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:s  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:s  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:se  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN  ;
0:s  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
0:s  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
+Use/NG:s  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN  ;
0:s  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:se  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:s  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

0:se  ADJ_BACK_DERIV_STI  ;
0:s  ADJ_BACK_ESSIVE_NA_ARCHAIC  ;
0  ADJ_COMPOUND_S  ;

LEXICON ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 38 front
!!€  kylmäjärkinen: kylmäjärkinen+A+Sg+Nom # levelminded
0:nen  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:se  ADJ_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0:s  ADJ_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:s  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ  ;
0:se  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN  ;
0:s  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
0:s  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
+Use/NG:s  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN  ;
0:s  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:se  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:s  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  !s-final adjectives

!!  Most of the cases here are nouns from noun derivations.

LEXICON ADJ_SYMPPIS
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 39
!!€  symppis: symppis+A+Sg+Nom # sympathetic
0:s  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:kse  ADJ_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0:ks  ADJ_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:s  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ  ;
0:kse  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN  ;
0:ks  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
0:ks  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
+Use/NG:s  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN  ;
0:ks  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:kse  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:ks  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_LÄHTEISYYS
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 40
!!€  lähteisyys: lähteisyys+A+Sg+Nom # sourceful
0:s  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:te  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:de  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:ks  ADJ_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:t  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ  ;
0:te  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN  ;
0:ks  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
0:ks  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:ks  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:de  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:ks  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_AUTUAS
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 41 as
!!€  autuas: autuas+A+Sg+Nom # ignorant
0:s  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:s  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_VALMIS
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 41 is
!!€  valmis: valmis+A+Sg+Nom # ready
0:s  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:i  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:s  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:i  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:i  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

:ihi  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS_ARCHAIC  ;
:eh  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE_ARCHAIC  ;

:is  ADJ_BACK_ESSIVE_NA_ARCHAIC  ;
+Use/NG:is  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN_ARCHAIC  ;


LEXICON ADJ_TIIVIS

0:i  ADJ_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:i  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ  ;
0:i  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:i  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:i  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:i  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;

0:ihi  ADJ_FRONT_SINGULARS_ARCHAIC  ;

0:ii  ADJ_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0:ii  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;

0:is  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:is  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ  ;
0:is  ADJ_FRONT_ESSIVE_NÄ_ARCHAIC  ;
+Use/NG:is  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN_ARCHAIC  ;
0:is  ADJ_COMPOUND_0  ;

:e  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

:eh  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE_ARCHAIC  ;

:ihi  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE_ARCHAIC  ;

:ii  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;


LEXICON ADJ_TYÖLÄS
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 41 äs
!!€  työläs: työläs+A+Sg+Nom # studious
0:s  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:s  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_VOIMAKAS
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 41 kas
!!€  voimakas: voimakas+A+Sg+Nom # powerfui
0:as  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:kaa  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:ka  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:as  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:kaa  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;
0:ka  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0:ka  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:ka  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:ka  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:ka  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:kaa  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:ka  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_TYYLIKÄS
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 41 käs
!!€  tyylikäs: tyylikäs+A+Sg+Nom # stylish
0:äs  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:kää  ADJ_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0:kä  ADJ_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:äs  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ  ;
0:kää  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;
0:kä  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ  ;
0:kä  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:kä  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:kä  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:kä  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:kää  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:kä  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_REIPAS
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 41 pas
!!€  reipas: reipas+A+Sg+Nom 
0:as  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:paa  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:pa  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:as  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:paa  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;
0:pa  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0:pa  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:pa  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:pa  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:pa  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:paa  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:pa  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  No adjectives end in -päs

LEXICON ADJ_RIETAS
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 41 tas
!!€  rietas: rietas+A+Sg+Nom # lewd
0:as  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:taa  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:as  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:taa  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:ta  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:taa  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_RAITIS
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 41 tis
!!€  raitis: raitis+A+Sg+Nom # sober
0:is  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:tii  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:ti  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:is  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:tii  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;
0:ti  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0:ti  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:ti  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:ti  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:ti  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:tii  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:te  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  Gaps.

LEXICON ADJ_HIDAS
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 41 das
!!€  hidas: hidas+A+Sg+Nom # slow
0:das  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:taa  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:das  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:taa  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:ta  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:taa  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  Gaps

LEXICON ADJ_HARRAS
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 41 ras
!!€  harras: harras+A+Sg+Nom # humble
0:ras  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:taa  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:ras  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:taa  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:ta  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:taa  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  !t-finals

LEXICON ADJ_OHUT
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 43 back
!!€  ohut: ohut+A+Sg+Nom # thin
0:t  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:t  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;
