src/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON ADJECTIVE
ahdas+A:ah  ADJ_HIDAS  ;
aulis+A:aul  ADJ_VALMIS  ;
brokadikudoksinen+A:brokadi#kudoksi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN  ;
edistyksellinen+A:edistykselli  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
epäaistikas+A:epäaistik  ADJ_VOIMAKAS  ;
epäkohtelias+A:epäkohtelia  ADJ_AUTUAS  ;
epäpuhdas+A:epäpuh  ADJ_HIDAS  ;
epäpuhdas+A:epä#puh  ADJ_HIDAS  ;
gaelinkielinen+A:gaelinkieli  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
harpunmallinen+A:harpun#malli  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN  ;
harras+A:har  ADJ_HARRAS  ;
henkäyksenohut+A:henkäyksenohu  ADJ_OHUT  ;
henkäyksenohut+A:henkäyksen#ohu  ADJ_OHUT  ;
hidas+A:hi  ADJ_HIDAS  ;
hinnakas+A:hinnak  ADJ_VOIMAKAS  ;
huippuälykäs+A:huippu#älyk  ADJ_TYYLIKÄS  ;
ilmatiivis+A:ilma#tiiv  ADJ_TIIVIS  ;
ilmatiivis+A:ilmatiivi  ADJ_VALMIS  ;
irstas+A:irsta  ADJ_AUTUAS  ;
jalopuinen+A:jalo#pui  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN  ;
juonteikas+A:juonteik  ADJ_VOIMAKAS  ;
jättiläismäinen+A:jättiläismäi  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
kaasutiivis+A:kaasutiiv  ADJ_TIIVIS  ;
kaasutiivis+A:kaasu#tiiv  ADJ_TIIVIS  ;
kallis+A:kall  ADJ_VALMIS  ;
katuälykäs+A:katu#älyk  ADJ_TYYLIKÄS  ;
kaunis+A:kaun  ADJ_VALMIS  ;
kekseliäs+A:kekseliä  ADJ_TYÖLÄS  ;
kernas+A:kerna  ADJ_AUTUAS  ;
kiihkokansallinen+A:kiihko#kansalli  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN  ;
kolmivuotias+A:kolmivuotia  ADJ_AUTUAS  ;
kristallinkirkas+A:kristallinkirk  ADJ_VOIMAKAS  ;
kutsuntaikäinen+A:kutsuntaikäi  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
kuvankaunis+A:kuvankaun  ADJ_VALMIS  ;
käytteliäs+A:käytteliä  ADJ_TYÖLÄS  ;
kääväkäs+A:kääväk  ADJ_TYYLIKÄS  ;
kömpelötekoinen+A:kömpelö#tekoi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN  ;
köynneliäs+A:köynneliä  ADJ_TYÖLÄS  ;
luonnikas+A:luonnik  ADJ_VOIMAKAS  ;
lyijynraskas+A:lyijyn#raska  ADJ_AUTUAS  ;
tyhjänpäiväisyys+A:tyhjänpäiväisyy ADJ_LÄHTEISYYS  ;
lähteisyys+A:lähteisyy  ADJ_LÄHTEISYYS  ;
marras+A:mar  ADJ_HARRAS  ;
merimiehekäs+A:meri#miehek  ADJ_TYYLIKÄS  ;
mierolainen+A:mierolai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN  ;
mietteliäs+A:mietteliä  ADJ_TYÖLÄS  ;
mikrotekninen+A:mikro#tekni  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
mukaantullut+A:mukaantullu  ADJ_OHUT  ;
mukanaollut+A:mukanaollu  ADJ_OHUT  ;
muotokaunis+A:muotokaun  ADJ_VALMIS  ;
nelivuotias+A:nelivuotia  ADJ_AUTUAS  ;
niljakas+A:niljak  ADJ_VOIMAKAS  ;
ohut+A:ohu  ADJ_OHUT  ;
palvelualtis+A:palvelualt  ADJ_RAITIS  ;
palvelualtis+A:palvelu#alt  ADJ_RAITIS  ;
paperinohut+A:paperinohu  ADJ_OHUT  ;
paperinohut+A:paperin#ohu  ADJ_OHUT  ;
piikikäs+A:piikik  ADJ_TYYLIKÄS  ;
piikkiselkäinen+A:piikki#selkäi  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
pisteliäs+A:pisteliä  ADJ_TYÖLÄS  ;
puhdas+A:puh  ADJ_HIDAS  ;
puhdassointinen+A:puhdas#sointi  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN  ;
putipuhdas+A:putipuh  ADJ_HIDAS  ;
pölytiivis+A:pölytiiv  ADJ_TIIVIS  ;
pölytiivis+A:pöly#tiiv  ADJ_TIIVIS  ;
raitis+A:rait  ADJ_RAITIS  ;
raivoraitis+A:raivorait  ADJ_RAITIS  ;
raivoraitis+A:raivo#rait  ADJ_RAITIS  ;
rasvatiivis+A:rasvatiiv  ADJ_TIIVIS  ;
rautias+A:rautia  ADJ_AUTUAS  ;
rehvakas+A:rehvak  ADJ_VOIMAKAS  ;
reipas+A:reip  ADJ_REIPAS  ;
rietas+A:riet  ADJ_RIETAS  ;
riskialtis+A:riskialt  ADJ_RAITIS  ;
riskialtis+A:riski#alt  ADJ_RAITIS  ;
rytmikäs+A:rytmik  ADJ_TYYLIKÄS  ;
sammalenvärinen+A:sammalenväri  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
sanavalmis+A:sanavalmi  ADJ_VALMIS  ;
satavuotias+A:satavuotia  ADJ_AUTUAS  ;
seitinohut+A:seitinohu  ADJ_OHUT  ;
symppis+A:symppi  ADJ_SYMPPIS  ;
sähköopillinen+A:sähköopilli  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN  ;
särmikäs+A:särmik  ADJ_TYYLIKÄS  ;
säästeliäs+A:säästeliä  ADJ_TYÖLÄS  ;
tapahtumarikas+A:tapahtumarik  ADJ_VOIMAKAS  ;
teräväpiirteinen+A:teräväpiirtei  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
tiivis+A:tiiv  ADJ_TIIVIS  ;
tilanneraitis+A:tilannerait  ADJ_RAITIS  ;
tilanneraitis+A:tilanne#rait  ADJ_RAITIS  ;
toimitusvalmis+A:toimitusvalm  ADJ_VALMIS  ;
tyyris+A:tyyr  ADJ_TIIVIS  ;
työteliäs+A:työteliä  ADJ_TYÖLÄS  ;
tähdikäs+A:tähdik  ADJ_TYYLIKÄS  ;
uunivalmis+A:uuni#valmi  ADJ_VALMIS  ;
vaitelias+A:vaitelia  ADJ_AUTUAS  ;
valkuaisrikas+A:valkuaisrik  ADJ_VOIMAKAS  ;
valpas+A:valp  ADJ_REIPAS  ;
veres+A:vere  ADJ_SYMPPIS  ;
vesitiivis+A:vesi#tiiv  ADJ_TIIVIS  ;
viitseliäs+A:viitseliä  ADJ_TYÖLÄS  ;
vilpas+A:vilp  ADJ_REIPAS  ;
voimakasääninen+A:voimakas#ääni  ADJ_KYLMÄJÄRKINEN  ;
wagnerilainen+A:wagnerilai  ADJ_AAKKOSELLINEN  ;
yritteliäs+A:yritteliä  ADJ_TYÖLÄS  ;
äkämys+A:äkämy  ADJ_SYMPPIS  ;
ärhäkäs+A:ärhäk  ADJ_TYYLIKÄS  ;
